apertium-pl-dsb.dsb.dix
    <pardef n="mache/ta__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>towu</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>toma</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>toma</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>toma</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tow</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tam</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tami</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tach</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="žon/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owu</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ru/ka__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kowu</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koma</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koma</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koma</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kow</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kam</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kami</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kach</l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="žona"><i>žon</i><par n="žon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Anglosaksowka"><i>Anglosaksow</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Azerbajdžanarka"><i>Azerbajdžanar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Barlinjarka"><i>Barlinjar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Blunjanarka"><i>Blunjanar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Brjazynkarka"><i>Brjazynkar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Chilenarka"><i>Chilenar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Egyptarka"><i>Egyptar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Frizowka"><i>Frizow</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gołynkarka"><i>Gołynkar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gubinarka"><i>Gubinar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Jabłonjarka"><i>Jabłonjar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Rogeńcarka"><i>Rogeńcar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aerodynamika"><i>aerodynami</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aktowka"><i>aktow</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antialkoholikarka"><i>antialkoholikar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asistenka"><i>asisten</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bacchantka"><i>bacchant</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baskowka"><i>baskow</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biskupka"><i>biskup</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brigaděrka"><i>brigaděr</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="camparka"><i>campar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chromatika"><i>chromati</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyganka"><i>cygan</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dialektika"><i>dialekti</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dopomnjeńka"><i>dopomnjeń</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eklektikarka"><i>eklektikar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektrikarka"><i>elektrikar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="entertainerka"><i>entertainer</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fantastika"><i>fantasti</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filmoteka"><i>filmote</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fotografowka"><i>fotografow</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garbowarka"><i>garbowar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gipsowarka"><i>gipsowar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gramatika"><i>gramati</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gósćinarka"><i>gósćinar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ilustratorka"><i>ilustrator</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kapitalistka"><i>kapitalist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klientka"><i>klient</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komponistka"><i>komponist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kritikarka"><i>kritikar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kóńcowka"><i>kóńcow</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="linguistika"><i>linguisti</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="matematika"><i>matemati</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mjazyplatka"><i>mjazyplat</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="měrka"><i>měr</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naturalistka"><i>naturalist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nonkonformistka"><i>nonkonformist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oboistka"><i>oboist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="papjerjanka"><i>papjerjan</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pianistka"><i>pianist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="politikarka"><i>politikar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="programěrarka"><i>programěrar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="putšistka"><i>putšist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pěškarka"><i>pěškar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pśijaśelnicka"><i>pśijaśelnic</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="randalěrarka"><i>randalěrar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rekrutka"><i>rekrut</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="romanika"><i>romani</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rytmikarka"><i>rytmikar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sebjekritika"><i>sebjekriti</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skeptikarka"><i>skeptikar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sopranistka"><i>sopranist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spěchowarka"><i>spěchowar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stonožka"><i>stonož</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="słowjanka"><i>słowjan</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tektonika"><i>tektoni</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="towariška"><i>towariš</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="winicarka"><i>winicar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wobrazowka"><i>wobrazow</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wrośarka"><i>wrośar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wusedlarka"><i>wusedlar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wósymźasetka"><i>wósymźaset</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="y-wóska"><i>y-wós</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zawězka"><i>zawěz</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="złotoritka"><i>złotorit</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šaparka"><i>šapar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="špisarka"><i>špisar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ženjarka"><i>ženjar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
